Massachusetts, session 194th, H721.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special legislative commission established pursuant to section 2A of
chapter 4 of the General Laws to reassess school integration within the Metropolitan Council for
Educational Opportunity program, hereinafter called the METCO program.
The commission shall consist of 13 members: 2 of whom shall be the chairs of the joint
committee on education or their designees, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 of whom shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives or a designee; 1 of whom shall be
appointed by the president of the senate or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the minority leader of
the house of representatives or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the minority leader of the senate
or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the secretary of education or a designee; 1 of whom shall be
of 2

the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the
president of the Black Educators Alliance of Massachusetts, Inc. or a designee; 1 of whom shall
be the president of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People New
England Area Conference or a designee; and 3 of whom shall be appointed by the governor and
shall be former participants in the METCO program.
The commission shall evaluate the historical impact of the METCO program in the
commonwealth and make recommendations to the general court regarding school integration and
improvements to the program.
(b) The commission shall convene beginning not later than 180 days after the effective
date of this act and meet not fewer than 4 times. The commission shall submit its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, by filing the same with the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate and the governor not later than 1 year after the effective date
of this act.
of 2